Missouri, session 2026, SB1040.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 67, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 67.1790, to read as
follows:
67.1790. 1. The board of education of a metropolitan
school district may impose a sales tax on all retail sales
made within the district that are subject to sales tax under
chapter 144 for the purpose of funding special educational
services in the district. The tax shall not exceed one
quarter of one percent and shall be imposed solely for the
purpose of funding special educational services in the
district. The tax authorized in this section shall be in
addition to all other sales taxes imposed by law and shall
be stated separately from all other charges and taxes. The
sales tax authorized pursuant to this section shall not
become effective unless the board of education of the
metropolitan district submits to the voters residing within
the district, at a general election, a proposal to authorize
the school board of the metropolitan district to impose a
tax under this section.

SB 1040 2
2. The question of whether the tax authorized by this
section shall be imposed shall be submitted in substantially
the following form:
OFFICIAL BALLOT
Shall ........................(name of school district)
impose a district-wide sales tax at a rate of .....
(insert rate of percent) percent for the purpose of
funding special educational services in the district?
□ YES □ NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in
the box opposite "YES". If you are opposed to the
question, place an "X" in the box opposite "NO".
If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the
qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of the
question, the sales tax shall become effective on the first
day of the second calendar quarter after the director of
revenue receives notice of adoption of the tax. If a
majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified
voters voting thereon are opposed to the question, the
school board of the metropolitan district may not impose the
sales tax authorized under this section unless and until the
question is resubmitted under this section to the qualified
voters and such question is approved by a majority of the
qualified voters voting on the question.
3. On or after the effective date of any tax
authorized under this section, the district shall enter into
an agreement with the director of the department of revenue
for the purpose of collecting the tax authorized in this
section. On or after the effective date of the tax, the

SB 1040 3
director of revenue shall be responsible for the
administration, collection, enforcement, and operation of
the tax, and sections 32.085 and 32.087 shall apply.
4. All revenue collected under this section by the
director of the department of revenue on behalf of the
metropolitan district, except for one percent for the cost
of collection which shall be deposited in the state's
general revenue fund, shall be deposited in a special trust
fund, which is hereby created and shall be known as the
"Special Educational Services Sales Tax Trust Fund", and
shall be used solely for the designated purposes. Moneys in
the fund shall not be deemed to be state funds, and shall
not be commingled with any funds of the state. The director
may make refunds from the amounts in the trust fund for
erroneous payments and overpayments made, and may redeem
dishonored checks and drafts. Not later than the tenth day
of each month the director of revenue shall distribute all
moneys deposited in the trust fund during the preceding
month by distributing such funds to the metropolitan
district. Any funds in the special trust fund which are not
needed for current expenditures shall be invested in the
same manner as other funds are invested. Any interest and
moneys earned on such investments shall be credited to the
fund.
✓